Utah statutes.
32A-10-207 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Information obtained by investigator.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Investigator" means an individual who is:
(i) (A)  an auditor or inspector; and
(B)  employed by the department; or
(ii) (A)  a peace officer, examiner, or investigator; and
(B)  employed by a nondepartment enforcement agency.
(b)  "Nondepartment enforcement agency" means an agency that:
(i) (A)  is a state agency other than the department; or
(B)  is an agency of a county, city, or town; and
(ii)  has a responsibility, as provided in another provision of this title, to
enforce one or more provisions of this title.
(c) (i)  "Record" means information that is:
(A)  inscribed on a tangible medium; or
(B)  stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable
form.
(ii)  "Record" includes:
(A)  book;
(B)  book of account;
(C)  paper;
(D)  contract;
(E)  agreement;
(F)  document; or
(G)  recording in any medium.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), if an investigator is permitted by
another provision of this chapter to inspect a book or record of an on-premise
beer retailer licensee that is a tavern, in addition to any other rights under
this title, the investigator may inspect, have a copy of, or otherwise review
any record of the tavern that is a visual recording of the operations of the
tavern.
(b)  An investigator who is a peace officer may not inspect, have a copy of,
or otherwise review a visual recording described in Subsection (2)(a) without
probable cause.
